Wisconsin, session 2025, AB775.
do enact as follows:AB775,11Section 1. 609.83 of the statutes is amended to read:AB775,2,42609.83 Coverage of drugs and devices. Limited service health 3organizations, preferred provider plans, and defined network plans are subject to 4ss. 632.853, 632.861, and 632.895 (12r), (16t), and (16v).AB775,25Section 2. 632.895 (12r) of the statutes is created to read:AB775,2,106632.895 (12r) Epinephrine delivery systems. (a) In this subsection, 7“epinephrine delivery system” means a device that is approved by the federal food 8and drug administration, that contains a premeasured dose of epinephrine, and 9that is used to administer epinephrine into the human body to prevent or treat a 10life-threatening allergic reaction.AB775,2,1511(b) Every disability insurance policy, and every self-insured health plan of the 12state or a county, city, village, town, or school district, that provides coverage of 13medically necessary epinephrine delivery systems may not impose cost sharing on 14epinephrine delivery systems in an amount that exceeds $60 for two doses of the 15epinephrine delivery system, regardless of the type of epinephrine delivery system.AB775,2,2016(c) Nothing in this subsection prohibits a disability insurance policy or self-17insured health plan from imposing cost sharing on epinephrine delivery systems in 18an amount less than the amount specified under par. (b). Nothing in this 19paragraph requires a disability insurance policy or self-insured health plan to 20impose any cost sharing on epinephrine delivery systems.AB775,321Section 3. Initial applicability.AB775,2,2222(1) Epinephrine delivery systems.AB775,3,31(a) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with s. 632.895 2(12r), the treatment of s. 632.895 (12r) first applies to policy or plan years beginning 3on the effective date of this paragraph, except as provided in par. (b).AB775,3,84(b) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 5agreement containing provisions inconsistent with s. 632.895 (12r), the treatment 6of s. 632.895 (12r) first applies to policy or plan years beginning on the effective date 7of this paragraph or on the day on which the collective bargaining agreement is 8newly established, extended, modified, or renewed, whichever is later.AB775,49Section 4. Effective date.AB775,3,1110(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 11publication.AB775,3,1212